Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202280-901
Member of Active Selected Reserve; tuition credit; amount; duration.

Any Nebraska resident who is a member of a Nebraska-based unit of the Active Selected Reserve of the armed forces of the United States, who meets the requirements set forth in section 80-902 and complies with section 80-903, and who enrolls in any state-supported university, college, or community college in this state shall be entitled to a credit of (1) seventy-five percent of the resident tuition charges of such school for a diploma, certificate, associate degree, or baccalaureate degree program or (2) fifty percent of the resident tuition charges of such school for a graduate or professional degree program. Such entitlement shall be continuous so long as the member maintains satisfactory service in the Active Selected Reserve and pursues a course of study in a manner which satisfies the normal requirements of the university, college, or community college.

Laws 1976, LB 266, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB4, § 1.